Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 1

Prohibited Practices Generally

2-19-101. Interfering with nominating meeting or election.

A person commits a Class A misdemeanor if such person:

Breaks up or attempts to break up any legally authorized political party nominating meeting or any election by force or violence;

Assaults or attempts to assault the persons conducting the meeting or the election officials;

Destroys or carries away or attempts to destroy or carry away a ballot box or voting machine; or

Uses force or violence in any other way to prevent the fair and lawful conduct of the nominating meeting or election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1901; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1999, ch. 216, § 1.

Cross-References. Conspiracy to violate election laws, penalty, §39-12-103.

State guard use to supervise, etc., election prohibited, §58-1-402.

National guard influence of election prohibited, §58-1-229.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Telephone cooperative elections, violations, and penalties, §65-29-133.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 26.

Law Reviews.

Rethinking the Right to Vote Under State Constitutions, 67 Vand. L. Rev. En Banc 189 (2014).

Attorney General Opinions. Permanent disqualification from office, OAG 00-055 (3/28/00).

2-19-102. Violation of title.

A person commits a Class C misdemeanor if such person knowingly does any act prohibited by this title, or if such person knowingly fails to do any act which such person is required to do by this title, or if such person knowingly does any act with the intent that another shall do an act prohibited by this title.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1902; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

2-19-103. Interference with another's duties or rights.

A person who knowingly does any act for the purpose of preventing any person's performance of such person's duties under this title or exercise of such person's rights under this title commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1903; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1999, ch. 216, § 2.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

2-19-104. Misconduct in performance of duties for purposes of misleading another.

A person commits a Class C misdemeanor who, with the purpose of misleading a person in the performance of such person's official duties under this title:

Makes any written or oral false statement which such person does not believe to be true;

Purposely creates a false impression in a written application required by this title by omitting information necessary to prevent statements therein from being misleading; or

Submits or invites reliance on any writing which such person knows to be forged, altered or otherwise lacking in authenticity.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1904; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

2-19-105. False swearing or affirming.

A person to whom an oath is legally administered under this title commits perjury if such person knowingly and willfully swears or affirms falsely touching a matter material to the point in question.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1905.

Cross-References. Perjury, §39-16-702.

2-19-106. Procurement or inducement to violate § 2-19-104 or § 2-19-105.

A person who procures or induces another to violate either §2-19-104 or §2-19-105 commits a Class D felony.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1906; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 10.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class D felony, §40-35-111.

2-19-107. Illegal registration or voting.

A person commits a Class D felony who:

Intentionally and knowing that such person is not entitled to, registers or votes in any manner or attempts to register or vote in any manner where or when such person is not entitled to under this title, including voting more than once in the same election; or

Votes in the primary elections of more than one (1) political party in an election.

When any person is convicted of a violation of subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(2), in addition to any other punishment that may be imposed for the offense, the court shall impose a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000). The additional fine shall be paid to the clerk of the court imposing sentence, who shall transfer it to the state treasurer, who shall deposit the fine in the reward pool fund, created by § 40-8-105.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1975, ch. 308, § 2; T.C.A., § 2-1907; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 11; 2004, ch. 480, § 10; 2006, ch. 903, § 1; 2014, ch. 724, § 9; 2017, ch. 246, § 1.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment substituted “in an election” for “on the same day” at the end of (2).

The 2017 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 724, § 12. April 16, 2014.

Acts 2017, ch. 246, § 4. July 1, 2017.

Cross-References. False entries, §2-19-109.

Penalty for Class D felony, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 27.

Law Reviews.

Fearing Fear Itself: Photo Identification Laws, Fear of Fraud, and the Fundamental Right to Vote (Joel A. Heller), 62 Vand. L. Rev. 1871 (2009).

Attorney General Opinions. Illegal registration under this section constitutes voter fraud for the purposes of T.C.A. §40-29-105, OAG 04-005 (1/12/04).

2-19-108. Unlawful possession of official registration or election supplies.

A person who knowingly possesses any official registration or election supplies, except as required or permitted by this title, commits a Class E felony.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1975, ch. 308, § 3; T.C.A., § 2-1908; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 12.

Cross-References. False entries on registration or documents, §2-19-109.

Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

2-19-109. False entries on official registration or election documents — Penalties.

A person who knowingly makes or consents to any false entry on any permanent registration, poll list, election tally sheet or any other official registration or election document commits a Class D felony.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1975, ch. 308, §§ 4, 5; T.C.A., § 2-1909; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 13; 2006, ch. 903, § 2.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class D felony, §40-35-111.

2-19-110. Abuse of voter assistance.

A person commits a Class A misdemeanor if such person assists any person in voting except as permitted by this title, or if such person knowingly casts any vote or consents to the casting of any vote contrary to the desire of the voter while otherwise lawfully assisting the voter in casting such person's vote or if, being an election official or other person otherwise lawfully assisting a voter, such person influences or attempts to influence the voter in casting such person's vote.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1910; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2006, ch. 903, § 3.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

2-19-111. Unlawful examination, removal, rejection or destruction of marked ballots.

A person commits a Class A misdemeanor if, except as required or permitted by this title, such person intentionally opens and examines any voter's marked ballot, removes the ballot from the ballot box, prevents the ballot being placed in the ballot box or destroys or changes a voter's ballot.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1911; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1999, ch. 216, § 3.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

2-19-112. Election officials — Civil liability.

If any person holding an election refuses to deliver to a person elected to any office a fair copy of the list of votes, when demanded according to law, or holds an election in any other manner than as directed by law, or neglects to make or to forward due returns thereof, such person shall forfeit and pay the sum of five hundred dollars ($500), to be recovered by action of debt in any court of record having cognizance thereof, with costs, one half (½) to the use of the state, the other one half (½) to such person who sues for the same.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1912.

2-19-113. Willful or fraudulent violations by officials.

Any election official or member of a board or commission holding office under this title who willfully or fraudulently violates any of the provisions of this title made for the protection of elections commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1913; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2001, ch. 465, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 465, § 1, provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as “The 2000 Presidential Election Debacle Reform Bill of 2001.”

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Collateral References.

Liability of public officer for breach of duty in respect of election or primary election laws. 153 A.L.R. 109.

2-19-114. Illegal act by official causing loss of ballots or invalidating election.

An election official or member of a board or commission holding office under this title commits a Class E felony if such person intentionally fails to do any official act required by law or does any illegal act, in relation to any election by which act or omission the votes taken at the election in any precinct are lost, or the electors thereof deprived of their suffrage at such election, or if such person intentionally does any act which renders such election void.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1914; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2001, ch. 465, § 10; 2006, ch. 903, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 465, § 1, provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as “The 2000 Presidential Election Debacle Reform Bill of 2001.”

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

2-19-115. Violence and intimidation to prevent voting.

It is a Class A misdemeanor for any person, directly or indirectly, personally or through any other person:

By force or threats to prevent or endeavor to prevent any elector from voting at any primary or final election;

To make use of any violence, force or restraint, or to inflict or threaten the infliction of any injury, damage, harm or loss; or

In any manner to practice intimidation upon or against any person in order to induce or compel such person to vote or refrain from voting, to vote or refrain from voting for any particular person or measure, or on account of such person having voted or refrained from voting in any such election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1915; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1999, ch. 216, § 4.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

2-19-116. Misrepresentations on campaign literature or sample ballots — Penalty.

No person shall print or cause to be printed or assist in the distribution or transportation of any facsimile of an official ballot, any unofficial sample ballot, writing, pamphlet, paper, photograph or other printed material which contains the endorsement of a particular candidate, group of candidates or proposition by an organization, group, candidate or other individual, whether existent or not, with the intent that the person receiving such printed material mistakenly believe that the endorsement of such candidate, candidates or proposition was made by an organization, group, candidate or entity other than the one or ones appearing on the printed material.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1916; Acts 1983, ch. 458, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Pretrial diversion, title 40, ch. 15.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

2-19-117. Procuring illegal vote.

It is a Class E felony for any person to procure, aid, assist, counsel or advise another to vote in any convention, primary or final election, knowing such person is disqualified.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1917; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 14.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

2-19-118. Unlawful acts related to voting machines, electronic poll books, voting devices, voting systems, vote tabulating devices, ballot tally software program source codes, official voter registration database, keys, or election websites.

A person commits an offense who, before, during, or after an election:

Intentionally tampers, interferes, or attempts to interfere with the correct operation of, or damages in order to prevent the use of, a voting machine, electronic poll book, voting device, voting system, vote tabulating device, or ballot tally software program source codes;

Intentionally tampers with, interferes with, attempts to interfere with, obtains unauthorized access to, or attempts to obtain unauthorized access to the official voter registration database, including, but not limited to, attempts to obtain plans, security codes, passwords, combinations, or computer programs used to protect electronic information and government property or information that would identify those areas of structural or operational vulnerability that would permit unlawful disruption to, or interference with the official voter registration database;

Knowingly and without authorization makes or has in the person's possession a key to a voting machine, voting system, tabulator, or ballot box that will be used in an election in this state;

Intentionally substitutes or attempts to substitute forged or counterfeit election results: or

Intentionally and without authorization, directly or indirectly, alters, damages, destroys. or attempts to alter, damage, or destroy or causes disruption to the proper operation of any election website maintained, hosted, or administered by a state or county governmental entity or a third party on behalf of or under contract with a state or county governmental entity.

A violation of subsection (a) is a Class D felony.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1918; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1994, ch. 859, § 11; 2020, ch. 635, § 2.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote the section, which read: “(a) A person who intentionally tampers with, mutilates or defaces a voting machine owned or used by a county or municipality commits an offense.“(b) This section shall not be construed to prohibit a person from performing a duty imposed by law with respect to a voting machine.“(c) A violation of this section is a Class E felony.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 635, § 4. April 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class D felony, §40-35-111.

2-19-119. Violation of § 2-7-111 while boundary signs are posted.

A person commits a Class C misdemeanor if such person violates §2-7-111 while boundary signs are posted.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1919; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Compiler's Notes. This section and §2-7-111 were held unconstitutional by the Tennessee Supreme Court in Freeman v. Burson, 802 S.W.2d 210 (Tenn. 1990). However, the United States Supreme Court reversed, upholding the validity of both statutes. See heading “Constitutionality” under Notes to Decisions.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

2-19-120. Political communications, advertising and solicitations — Contents — Applicability — Penalties.

Whenever any person makes an expenditure for the purpose of financing a communication that expressly advocates the election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate, as defined by § 2-10-102, or that solicits any contribution, through any broadcasting station, newspaper, magazine, outdoor advertising facility, poster, yard sign, direct mailing or any other form of general public political advertising, a disclaimer meeting the requirements of subdivision (a)(1), (2), (3) or (4) shall appear and be presented in a clear and conspicuous manner to give the reader, observer or listener adequate notice of the identity of persons who paid for and, where required, who authorized the communication. Such person is not required to place the disclaimer on the front face or page of any such material, as long as a disclaimer appears within the communication, except on communications, such as billboards, that contain only a front face.

Such communication, including any solicitation, if paid for and authorized by a candidate, an authorized committee of a candidate, or its agent shall clearly state that the communication has been paid for by the authorized political committee, in addition to the identity of the person who is the head of such committee, or the identity of the treasurer of such committee.

Such communication, including any solicitation, if authorized by a candidate, an authorized committee of a candidate or an agent thereof, but paid for by any other person, shall clearly state that the communication is paid for by such other person and is authorized by such candidate, authorized committee or agent.

Such communication, including any solicitation, if made on behalf of or in opposition to a candidate, but paid for by any other person and not authorized by a candidate, authorized committee of a candidate or its agent, shall clearly state that the communication has been paid for by such person and is not authorized by any candidate or candidate's committee.

For solicitations directed to the general public on behalf of a political committee which is not an authorized committee of a candidate, such solicitation shall clearly state the full name of the person who paid for the communication.

For purposes of this section, whenever a separate segregated fund solicits contributions to the fund from those persons it may solicit, such communication shall not be considered a form of general public advertising. Such advertisements shall also include the name of the printer of such advertisement, and the identity of the person who paid for the advertisement.

The requirements of this section do not apply to bumper stickers, pins, buttons, pens, novelties, and similar small items upon which the disclaimer cannot be conveniently printed.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1920; Acts 1987, ch. 395, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 812, §§ 1-3; 1991, ch. 436, § 1; 1992, ch. 666, §§ 1, 2; 2004, ch. 480, §§ 11, 12.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 26.

Law Reviews.

The Abolition of Anonymity — Distribution of Publications Act, 40 Tenn. L. Rev. 301 (1973).

Attorney General Opinions. Prohibition against anonymous campaign literature violates free speech clause, OAG 95-090 (8/29/95).

The disclaimer requirements of T.C.A. §2-19-120 apply when a person finances an election-related communication on a social media platform. T.C.A.. §2-10-105 is also applicable to political communications on social media platforms. OAG 18-37, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 36 (8/14/2018).

2-19-121. Candidate bargaining for support.

It is unlawful for any candidate for nomination or election in any state, county, city or district office, to expend, pay, promise, or loan or become pecuniarily liable in any way for money or other thing of value, either directly or indirectly, or to agree to enter into any contract with any person to vote for or support any particular policy or measure, in consideration of the vote or support, moral or financial, of such person. A violation of this section shall be punished as provided in §2-19-123.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1921.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. §2-19-121 is constitutional, OAG 07-113 (7/30/07).

Prohibition of candidate paying for endorsement, OAG 07-113 (7/30/07).

2-19-122. Demanding candidate make promise.

It is unlawful for any person to demand that any candidate for nomination or office shall promise or agree in advance to support any particular individual, policy or measure, in consideration of the vote or support, financial or moral, of such person, in any election, primary or nominating convention. A violation of this section shall be punished as provided in §2-19-123.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1922.

2-19-123. Penalty for violation of § 2-19-121 or § 2-19-122.

A violation of any of the provisions of §2-19-121 or §2-19-122 is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1923; Acts 1989, ch. 591 § 13.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

2-19-124. Exceptions to § 2-19-121 or § 2-19-122.

Nothing in §2-19-121 or §2-19-122 shall render illegal any expenditures made by any candidate, or by others, for or on the candidate's behalf, to employ clerks or stenographers in the candidate's campaign, for the printing and advertising therein, or the seeking of suitable halls for public speaking or meetings, or suitable headquarters, stationery and stamps, or the actual traveling expenses of such candidate or the candidate's supporters.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1924.

2-19-125. Bribing election officials.

It is unlawful for any person, directly or indirectly, personally or through any other person, to give or offer to give a bribe to any election official or to any administrator of elections or to any member of a board or commission holding office under this title as a consideration for any act done or omitted to be done contrary to such official's official duty under this title.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1925.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Cross-References. Penalty for violation of section, §2-19-128.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Bribery, §§ 2, 5.

2-19-126. Bribing voters.

It is unlawful for any person, directly or indirectly, personally or through any other person to:

Pay, loan, contribute, or offer or promise to pay, loan or contribute any money, property, or other valuable thing, to or for any voter, or to or for any other person, to induce such voter or any voter to vote or refrain from voting in any political convention, primary or final election of any kind or character, or to induce such voter or voters to vote or refrain from voting at any such convention, primary or final election for or against any particular person or measure, or on account of any voter having voted for or against any particular person or measure, or having gone to or remained away from the polls at any such convention, primary or final election;

Give, offer, or promise any place, office or employment, or promise or procure any place, office or employment, to or for any voter, or to or for any other person, in order to induce such voter to vote or refrain from voting at any convention, primary or final election, or to induce any voter at such convention or primary or final election to vote or refrain from voting for any particular person or measure;

Advance or pay or cause to be paid any money or other valuable thing to or for the use of any voter, or to or for the use of any other person, with the intent that the same or any part thereof shall be used in bribery at any primary or final election, or otherwise unlawfully used at, concerning, or in connection with any such primary or final election; or knowingly pay or cause to be paid any money or other valuable thing in discharge or repayment of money or other valuable thing wholly or in part expended in bribery or other unlawful use at or in connection with any such primary or final election; or

Advance, pay or cause to be paid, as expenses or otherwise, to or for the use of any person, any money or other valuable thing in order to induce such person or any person to work for, solicit or seek to influence votes for or against any particular person or measure, at or in connection with any convention, primary or final election; or induce such person or persons to procure, solicit or influence any voter to attend, leave, or remain away from any such convention, primary or final election; or pay or cause to be paid any money or other valuable thing to or for the use or benefit of any person in discharge or payment of or for time, labor, expenses, or services alleged to have been spent, performed, incurred, or rendered for or against any person, at or in connection with any such convention, primary or final election; provided, that this shall not include payment of expenses for soliciting attendance of any person upon party conventions, primaries, or final elections; and provided further, that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit expenditures otherwise allowed by law.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1926.

Cross-References. Penalties against corporations and officers for violation of section, §2-19-140.

Penalty for violation of section, §2-19-128.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Bribery, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. It would violate T.C.A. §2-19-126(1) for a private club to have a drawing on December 1, 2002, in which eligible participants would include all members in good standing whose dues payments are up to date and in which three names would be drawn and a valuable prize awarded to the members whose names are drawn and who, according to public records, voted in the November 2002 election, OAG 02-073 (6/10/02).

2-19-127. Voter accepting bribe.

It is unlawful for any person, directly or indirectly, personally or through any other person, to:

Receive, agree to receive, or contract for, before or during any primary or final election or convention provided by law, any money, gift, loan, or other valuable consideration, or any office, place or employment for such person or for any other person, for voting or agreeing to vote, or for going to or remaining or agreeing to remain away from the polls, or refraining or agreeing to refrain from voting for any particular person or measure, at or in connection with any such convention, primary or election; or

Receive any money or other valuable thing during or after any convention, primary or final election provided by law, on account of such person or any other person, for voting or refraining from voting for any person or measure, or for going to the polls or remaining away from the polls at any such convention, primary or final election, or on account of having induced any person to vote or refrain from voting for any particular person or measure at any such convention, primary or final election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1927.

Cross-References. Penalty for violation of section, §2-19-128.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Bribery, § 2.

2-19-128. Penalty for violation of §§ 2-19-125 — 2-19-127.

Any person convicted of any of the offenses mentioned in §§2-19-125 —2-19-127 commits a Class C felony.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1928; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 9.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C felony, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Bribery, § 2.

2-19-129. Betting on election — Penalty.

A person commits a Class C misdemeanor if such person makes any bet or wager of money or other valuable thing upon any election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1929; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Gambling, §39-17-502.

Limitation of prosecution, §40-2-102.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gaming, Gambling and Gambling Contracts, § 5.

2-19-130. Candidate betting with voter.

It is a Class C misdemeanor for any candidate for public office, before or during any primary or final election provided by law, to make any bet or wager with a voter, or to take a share or interest in, or in any manner become a party to any such bet or wager, or provide or agree to provide any money to be used by another in making such bet or wager, upon any event or contingency whatever, arising out of such election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1930; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

2-19-131. Betting with voter to procure a challenge or to prevent him from voting.

It is a Class C misdemeanor for any person, directly or indirectly, to make a bet or wager with a voter, depending upon the result of any primary or final election provided by law, with the intent thereby to procure the challenge of such voter, or to prevent the voter from voting at such election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1931; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

2-19-132. [Repealed.]

Acts 2019, ch. 250, § 6; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 654, § 1, effective April 2, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Former §2-19-132 (Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1932; Acts 1989, ch. 357, § 1; 1990, ch. 841, § 1), concerning the improper use of corporate funds in elections, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 1095, § 1, effective June 23, 2010.

Former §2-19-132, concerning the disclaimer required for public communication regarding voter registration status, website for voter registration purposes, and voter lookup website, was repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 654, § 1, effective April 2, 2020.

2-19-133. False or misleading information regarding voting.

A person commits an offense who, with intent to deceive or disseminate information that person knows to be incorrect, provides or publishes false or misleading information regarding the qualifications to vote, the requirements to register to vote, whether an individual voter is currently registered to vote or eligible to register to vote, voter registration deadlines, or polling dates, times, and locations.

A violation of subsection (a) is a Class E felony.

Acts 2020, ch. 635, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §2-19-133 (Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1933; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 841, § 2), concerning penalties for the improper use of corporate funds in elections, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 1095, § 2, effective June 23, 2010.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 635, § 4. April 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

Publication of incorrect voter information, §2-2-142.

2-19-134. Coercing or directing employees to vote for measure, party, or person — Penalty.

It is unlawful for any person to coerce or direct any employee to vote for any measure, party or person who may be a candidate for any office, or for any person who may be a candidate for nomination for any office, to threaten the discharge of such employee if the employee votes or does not vote for any such candidate for nomination or for office, or for any particular policy or measure.

It is unlawful to discharge any employee on account of such employee's exercise or failure to exercise the suffrage, or to give out or circulate any statement or report calculated to intimidate or coerce any employee to vote or not to vote for any candidate or measure.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1934; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalties against corporations and officers for violation of section, §2-19-140.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Collateral References.

Suspension or expulsion of member of labor union for refusal to pay assessment imposed for purpose of promoting or defeating contemplated legislation as violation of statute against intimidation of voters. 175 A.L.R. 397.

2-19-135. Threatening work stoppage as a result of election.

It is a Class C misdemeanor for any employer, within ninety (90) days of any election or primary provided for by law, to put up or otherwise exhibit in such employer's factory, workshop, mine, mill, boardinghouse, office, or other establishment or place where employees may be working or may be present in the course of their employment, any handbill, notice, or placard containing any threat, notice or information that in case any particular ticket or candidate shall or shall not be elected, work in that establishment shall cease in whole or in part, or the wages or number of workers be reduced, or other threats, express or implied, intended or calculated to influence the political opinions or actions of the employees.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1935; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

2-19-136. Grand jury witness immunity.

When any person, without such person's contrivance or procurement, is sent as a witness before the grand jury and is examined before them touching offenses under this chapter, no person against whom such person's evidence is given can afterwards be used as a witness against the person when on trial for an offense under this chapter committed previous to the person's being examined as a witness as aforementioned.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1944.

Collateral References.

Self-incrimination before grand jury investigating election. 38 A.L.R.2d 225.

2-19-137. Violators as witnesses — Exemption from prosecution.

A person offending against any of the provisions of this chapter shall be a competent witness against any other person violating any provisions of this chapter, and may be compelled to attend and testify upon any trial, hearing, proceeding, or investigation in the same manner as any other person, but the testimony so given shall not be used in any prosecution or proceeding, civil or criminal, against the person so testifying, except for perjury in giving such testimony, and a person so testifying shall not thereafter be liable to indictment, prosecution, or punishment for the offense with reference to which such testimony was given, and may plead or prove the giving of the testimony accordingly in bar of such an indictment or prosecution.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1945.

Cross-References. Offense of perjury, penalties, title 39, chapter 16, part 7.

2-19-138. Defects or irregularities in conventions or elections no defense.

No defect or irregularity in calling any political convention, or any primary or final election, nor any irregularity in the proceedings or organization or conduct thereof, shall be available as a defense under this chapter.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1946.

2-19-139. Permitted expenses.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent a candidate in any political convention or in any primary or final election, or any person, from employing and maintaining a proper clerical or office force so employed and maintained in good faith, nor to prevent any political parties, candidates, nominees, and organizations from disseminating literature and defraying the expense of public speakers, nor from announcing any candidacy in any newspaper.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the hiring of conveyances for voters who may be sick or otherwise unable to go to the polls; provided, that such expenses shall in no case exceed those allowed by law.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1947.

2-19-140. Penalty against corporation and officers.

Any corporation offending against this chapter may be found guilty, and it and its officers through whom such offense was committed shall be fined and the officers imprisoned as other persons under this chapter.

Any corporation violating § 2-19-126 or § 2-19-134 shall in addition forfeit its charter and right to do business in this state.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1948.

Cross-References. Violation of title, §2-19-102.

2-19-141. Disposition of fines.

All fines collected under this chapter shall be turned into the school fund.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1949.

2-19-142. Knowingly publishing false campaign literature.

It is a Class C misdemeanor for any person to publish or distribute or cause to be published or distributed any campaign literature in opposition to any candidate in any election if such person knows that any such statement, charge, allegation, or other matter contained therein with respect to such candidate is false.

Acts 1974, ch. 704, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1950; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

2-19-143. Suffrage for persons convicted of infamous crimes.

The following provisions shall govern the exercise of the right of suffrage for those persons convicted of an infamous crime:

No person who has been convicted of an infamous crime, as defined by § 40-20-112, in this state shall be permitted to register to vote or vote at any election unless such person has been pardoned by the governor, or the person's full rights of citizenship have otherwise been restored as prescribed by law. However, the governor may attach to any such pardon a special condition that such person shall not have the right of suffrage until a date certain in the future, or until the expiration of the pardoned sentence, whichever period of time is less.

No person who has been convicted in federal court of a crime or offense which would constitute an infamous crime under the laws of this state, regardless of the sentence imposed, shall be allowed to register to vote or vote at any election unless such person has been pardoned or restored to the full rights of citizenship by the president of the United States, or the person's full rights of citizenship have otherwise been restored in accordance with federal law, or the law of this state.

No person who has been convicted in another state of a crime or offense which would constitute an infamous crime under the laws of this state, regardless of the sentence imposed, shall be allowed to register to vote or vote at any election in this state unless such person has been pardoned or restored to the rights of citizenship by the governor or other appropriate authority of such other state, or the person's full rights of citizenship have otherwise been restored in accordance with the laws of such other state, or the law of this state.

The provisions of this section, relative to the forfeiture and restoration of the right of suffrage for those persons convicted of infamous crimes, shall also apply to those persons convicted of crimes prior to May 18, 1981, which are infamous crimes after May 18, 1981.

Acts 1981, ch. 345, §§ 2, 8; 1983, ch. 207, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Portions of this section concerning retroactive disenfranchisement of convicted felons whose crimes were not infamous when convicted but were after May 18, 1981, have been held unconstitutional. See Notes to Decisions, 1. Constitutionality. Gaskin v. Collins, 661 S.W.2d 865 (Tenn. 1983).

Cross-References. Acts purging registration, §2-2-106.

Duties of election coordinator, §2-11-202.

Judgment of infamy, §40-20-112.

Notice of infamy, §40-20-113.

Qualified voters, §2-2-102.

Registration information, §2-2-116.

Restoration of suffrage, §§2-2-139,40-29-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Citizenship, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Reawakening “Privileges or Immunities”: An Originalist Blueprint for Invalidating State Felon Disenfranchisement Laws (John Benjamin Schrade), 62 Vand. L. Rev. 1285 (2009).

Revisiting Wesley v. Collins and Tennessee’s Disenfranchisement Statute (Vanessa M. Cross), 36 U. Mem. L. Rev. 543 (2006).

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

The Right to Vote Under State Constitutions (Joshua A. Douglas), 67 Vand. L. Rev. 89 (2014).

Felon Disenfranchisement, 49 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1275 (Summer 2019).